Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1612
Commissioner; grant or deny authorization to operate.

Following review of an application for authorization to operate and any further information submitted by the applicant or required by the department and following such investigation of the applicant as the department may deem necessary or appropriate, the commissioner shall either grant or deny authorization to operate. A grant of authorization to operate may be on such terms and conditions as the commissioner may specify.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 13;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2813;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 12.